District of Columbia statutes.
50-401

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Commercial driver’s license” means a license issued pursuant to this chapter that authorizes an individual to operate a class of commercial motor vehicle.

(2)

“Commercial driver’s license information system” means the informational system established pursuant to the Commercial Motor Vehicle Safety Act of 1986, approved October 27, 1986 (100 Stat. 3207; 49 U.S.C. sec. 2701 et seq.) (“Commercial Motor Vehicle Safety Act”), to serve as a clearinghouse for locating information related to the licensing and identification of commercial motor vehicle drivers.

(3)

“Commercial motor vehicle” means a motor vehicle used in commerce to transport passengers or property:

(A)

If the vehicle has a gross vehicle weight rating of greater than 26,000 pounds or a lesser rating as determined by federal regulation but not less than a gross vehicle weight rating of 10,001 pounds;

(B)

If the vehicle is designed to transport more than 15 passengers, including the driver; or

(C)

If the vehicle is used to transport a material found to be hazardous by the Mayor in accordance with Chapter 14 of Title 8, or by the Secretary of Transportation in accordance with the Hazardous Materials Transportation Act, approved January 3, 1975 (88 Stat. 2156; 49 U.S.C. sec. 1801 et seq.).

(4)

“Disqualify” means to withdraw the privilege to drive a commercial motor vehicle.

(5)

“Out-of-service order” means a declaration by an authorized enforcement officer of a federal, state, Canadian, Mexican, or local jurisdiction that a driver, a commercial motor vehicle, or a motor carrier operation, is out-of-service pursuant to Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Regulations, 49 C.F.R. § 386.72, 392.5, 395.13, 396.9, or compatible laws, or the North American Uniform Out-of-Service Criteria.

Sept. 20, 1990, D.C. Law 8-161, § 2, 37 DCR 4665
Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-289, § 501(a), 48 DCR 2057

History

1981 Ed., § 40-1801.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 13-289 added par. (5).

Effect of Amendments

49 U.S.C. § 2701 et seq., referred to in (2), was repealed in 1994 by P.L. 103-272, § 7(b). For present law, see 49 U.S.C. § 31301 et seq.

The “Hazardous Materials Transportation Act,” referred to in (3)(C), is now codified at 49 U.S.C. § 5101 et seq.

References in Text